Utah statutes.
40-1-8.   Vacancy and removal -- County recorder to receive records.

(1)  If there is a vacancy in the office of recorder of any mining district, or if there is no person in the mining district authorized to retain the custody and give certified copies of the records, the person having custody of the records shall deposit them in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the mining district, or the greater part of the mining district, is situated.

(2)  That county recorder shall take possession of the records and may make and certify copies from the records, including any other copies of records and papers in the recorder's office pertaining to mining claims.

(3)  Those certified copies shall be receivable in evidence in all courts and before all officers and tribunals.

(4)  The production of a certified copy shall be, without further proof, evidence that the records were properly in the custody of the county recorder.



Amended by Chapter 85, 1999 General Session

